Utah statutes.
54-17-804.   Exemption from certificate of convenience and necessity requirements.

(1)  A qualified utility is not required to comply with Section 54-4-25 with respect to a renewable energy facility that is the subject of a renewable energy contract if:

(a)  each contract necessary for the commission to determine compliance with this part is filed with the commission; and

(b)  the commission determines that each contract relating to the renewable energy facility complies with this part.

(2)  In making its determination under Subsection (1)(b), the commission may process and consider together multiple renewable energy contracts between the same contract customer and the qualified utility providing for the delivery of electricity from a renewable energy facility to the contract customer's multiple metered delivery locations.



Enacted by Chapter 182, 2012 General Session

